Utah statutes.
75-5-432.   Foreign conservator -- Proof of authority -- Bond -- Powers.

If no local conservator has been appointed and no petition in a protective proceeding is pending in this state, a domiciliary foreign conservator may file with a court in this state in a county in which property belonging to the protected person is located, authenticated copies of his appointment and of any official bond he has given. Thereafter, he may exercise as to assets in this state all powers of a local conservator and may maintain actions and proceedings in this state subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally.



Amended by Chapter 194, 1977 General Session

